Arkansas, session 2025, HB1524.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 19-4-1405(a)(1)(A), concerning the bidding
procedure for the construction of buildings and facilities, is amended to
read as follows:
(a)(1)(A) After Except as provided in subsection (g) of this section,
after a state agency has caused the preparation and has approved plans and
specifications, it shall then proceed to advertise for bids for the
contemplated work by the publication of notice one (1) time each week for not
less than two (2) consecutive weeks for projects over the amount of fifty
thousand dollars ($50,000), and shall proceed to advertise for bids one (1)
time each week for not less than one (1) week for projects more than the
quote bid and less than or equal to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 19-4-1405, concerning the bidding procedure
for the construction of buildings and facilities, is amended to add an
additional subsection to read as follows:
(g) The provisions of this section concerning the preparation and
*LGL074*
04-10-2025 15:35:51 LGL074

As Engrossed: S4/10/25 HB1524
approval of plans and specifications do not apply to a repair, alteration, or
maintenance project that is:
(1) One hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) or less;
(2) Undertaken, owned, operated, or managed by the Department of
Parks, Heritage, and Tourism; and
(3) Funded by the tax revenue the department receives under
Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 75, § 2, that is appropriated for special
maintenance to the State Parks Division.

/s/Wooldridge


























04-10-2025 15:35:51 LGL074